test/src/morphology/N-yam_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ямʼ: # Noun 'sea' - partial paradigm /Type 25/ N_ӇУВО
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Nom: ямʼ
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Acc: явмʼ
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Gen: явʼ
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Dat: ямдʼ
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Loc: [ямгана, ямгна]
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Abl: ямгад
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Pros: ямна
     ямʼ+N+Du+Nom: ямгʼ
     ямʼ+N+Du+Acc: ямгʼ
     ямʼ+N+Du+Gen: ямгʼ
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Nom: явˮ
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Acc: яво
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Gen: явоˮ
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Dat: ямгаˮ
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Loc: [ямгаˮна, ямгˮна]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Abl: ямгат
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Pros: явоˮмана
     
     ямʼ+N+Tra: ямӈэ     
     ямʼ+N+Car: ямзиˮ
     ямʼ+N+Equ: ямдремʼ
     ямʼ+N+Equ+Lat: ямдревʼ

# Possessive forms 
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: ям
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ямл  
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ямда 
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: ямиʼ
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: ямлиʼ
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: ямдиʼ
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ямаˮ
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: ямлаˮ
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: ямдоʼ
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [ям, ями]
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: ямд  
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: ямда 
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: ямиʼ 
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: ямдиʼ
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: ямдиʼ
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: ямваˮ 
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: ямдаˮ
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: ямдоʼ
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [ямн, ямни] 
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ямнд  
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: ямнда 
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ямниʼ 
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: ямндиʼ
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: ямндиʼ
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: ямнаˮ 
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: ямндаˮ
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: ямндоʼ
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [ямган, ямгани] 
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: ямганд  
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ямганда 
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: [ямганиʼ, ямгниʼ] 
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: [ямгандиʼ, ямгндиʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: [ямгандиʼ, ямгндиʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: [ямганаˮ, ямгнаˮ]
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: [ямгандаˮ, ямгндаˮ]
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: [ямгандоʼ, ямгндоʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [ямганан, ямгнан, ямганани, ямгнани]
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: [ямгананд, ямгнанд]  
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [ямгананда, ямгнанда]
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: [ямгананиʼ, ямгнаниʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: [ямганандиʼ, ямгнандиʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: [ямганандиʼ, ямгнандиʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: [ямгананаˮ, ямгнанаˮ] 
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [ямганандаˮ, ямгнандаˮ]
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: [ямганандоʼ, ямгнандоʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [ямгадан, ямгдан]   
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [ямгадани, ямгдани]  
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: [ямгаданд, ямгданд]  
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: [ямгаданда, ямгданда] 
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [ямгаданиʼ, ямгданиʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: [ямгадандиʼ, ямгдандиʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: [ямгадандиʼ, ямгдандиʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [ямгаданаˮ, ямгданаˮ] 
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: [ямгадандаˮ, ямгдандаˮ]
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: [ямгадандоʼ, ямгдандоʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: явувнан   
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: явувнани  
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: явувнанд  
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: явувнанда 
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: явувнаниʼ 
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: явувнандиʼ
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: явувнандиʼ
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: явувнанаˮ 
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: явувнандаˮ
     ямʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: явувнандоʼ
     ямʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [ямгаюн, ямгюн]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: [ямгаюд, ямгюд]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: [ямгаюда, ямгюда]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: [ямгаюниʼ, ямгюниʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: [ямгаюдиʼ, ямгюдиʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: [ямгаюдиʼ, ямгюдиʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: [ямгаюнаˮ, ямгюнаˮ]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: [ямгаюдаˮ, ямгюдаˮ]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: [ямгаюдоʼ, ямгюдоʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [ямгаюн, ямгюн]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: [ямгаюд, ямгюд]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: [ямгаюда , ямгюда]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: [ямгаюниʼ, ямгюниʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: [ямгаюдиʼ, ямгюдиʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: [ямгаюдиʼ, ямгюдиʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: [ямгаюнаˮ, ямгюнаˮ]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: [ямгаюдаˮ, ямгюдаˮ]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: [ямгаюдоʼ, ямгюдоʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [ямгаюн, ямгюн]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: [ямгают, ямгют]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: [ямгаюта, ямгюта]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: [ямгаюниʼ, ямгюниʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: [ямгаютиʼ, ямгютиʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: [ямгаютиʼ, ямгютиʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: [ямгаюнаˮ, ямгюнаˮ]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: [ямгаютаˮ, ямгютаˮ]
     ямʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: [ямгаютоʼ, ямгютоʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [явон, явони]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: явод   
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: явода  
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: явониʼ 
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: яводиʼ 
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: яводиʼ 
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: явонаˮ 
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: яводаˮ 
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: яводоʼ 
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [явон, явони]   
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: явод   
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: явода  
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: явониʼ 
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: яводиʼ 
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: яводиʼ 
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: явонаˮ 
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: яводаˮ 
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: яводоʼ 
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: явоˮн  
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: явот   
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: явота  
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: явоˮниʼ
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: явотиʼ 
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: явотиʼ 
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: явоˮнаˮ 
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: явотаˮ 
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: явотоʼ 
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: ямгаˮн
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: ямгат
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [ямгата, ямгта]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: [ямгаˮниʼ, ямгˮниʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: [ямгатиʼ, ямгтиʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: [ямгатиʼ, ямгтиʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: [ямгаˮнаˮ, ямгˮнаˮ]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: [ямгатаˮ, ямгтаˮ]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: [ямгатоʼ, ямгтоʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [ямгаˮнан, ямгˮнан]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: [ямгаˮнат, ямгˮнат]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: [ямгаˮната, ямгˮната]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: [ямгаˮнаниʼ, ямгˮнаниʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: [ямгаˮнатиʼ, ямгˮнатиʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: [ямгаˮнатиʼ, ямгˮнатиʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: [ямгаˮнанаˮ, ямгˮнанаˮ]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: [ямгаˮнатаˮ, ямгˮнатаˮ]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [ямгаˮнатоʼ, ямгˮнатоʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [ямгатан, ямгтан]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [ямгатат, ямгтат]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [ямгатата, ямгтата]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [ямгатаниʼ, ямгтаниʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [ямгататиʼ, ямгтатиʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [ямгататиʼ, ямгтатиʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [ямгатанаˮ, ямгтанаˮ]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [ямгататаˮ, ямгтатаˮ]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [ямгататоʼ, ямгтатоʼ]
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: явоˮманан  
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: явоˮманат  
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: явоˮманата 
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: явоˮмананиʼ
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: явоˮманатиʼ
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: явоˮманатиʼ
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: явоˮмананаˮ
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: явоˮманатаˮ
     ямʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: явоˮманатоʼ

# Predestinative

     ямʼ+N+Pred+Abs: ямд
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [ямдав, ямдув]
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: ямдар  
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: ямдада
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [ямдав, ямдув]
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: ямдамд
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: ямдамда
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: ямдан
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: ямданд
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: ямданда
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: ямдамиʼ
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: ямдариʼ
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: ямдадиʼ
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: ямдамиʼ
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: ямдамдиʼ
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: ямдамдиʼ
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: ямданиʼ
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: ямдандиʼ
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: ямдандиʼ
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: ямдаваˮ
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: ямдараˮ
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: ямдадоʼ
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: ямдаваˮ
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: ямдамдаˮ
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: ямдамдоʼ
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: ямданаˮ
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: ямдандаˮ
     ямʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: ямдандоʼ
     
# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     ямʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: ямдмʼ
     ямʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: ямд  
     ямʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ямʼ 
     ямʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: ямниʼ
     ямʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: ямдиʼ
     ямʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ямгʼ
     ямʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: ямаˮ
     ямʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: ямдаˮ
     ямʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: явˮ  
     ямʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: ямдамзь
     ямʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: ямдась 
     ямʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ямзь   
     ямʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: ямнинзь
     ямʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: ямдинзь
     ямʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ямганзь
     ямʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: ямаць 
     ямʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: ямдаць 
     ямʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: яваць   
